Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 11 Meats

21-11-1.
“Animals” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter, “animal” is construed to mean any cattle, swine, sheep, goat, or equine.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 141, § 1.

21-11-2.
Sale of meat not handled in compliance with provisions.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to handle, sell, or possess with intent to sell within this state the carcass of any animal or part of the carcass, any meat, meat product, or meat food product capable of use as human food which has not been slaughtered, canned, cured, smoked, salted, packed, rendered, handled, or processed in compliance with the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2265, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-2

; P.L. 1970, ch. 141, § 2.

21-11-3.
License required for processing and packing houses.

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall operate within this state any establishment for the purpose of slaughtering any animal for human consumption, or for canning, curing, smoking, salting, packing, rendering, or handling the carcass of any animal or part of the carcass, or for the manufacturing of any meat product or meat food product, until that person, firm, association, or corporation shall have obtained a license from the department of health. This section shall not apply to a retail market offering for sale only those primal parts commonly known in the trade as sides, quarters, shoulders, hams, backs, bellies, tongues, livers, or similar parts, or meat, meat products, or meat food products, which have been obtained from the establishment of a person, firm, association, or corporation licensed in accordance with provisions of this section, nor to any retail market where meat processing consists solely of grinding meat for sale on the premises.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 2; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1469, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-3

; P.L. 1970, ch. 141, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 47.

21-11-4.
Issuance and term of licenses — Suspension or revocation.

The director of health shall, upon receipt of application for a license to operate an establishment for any or all of the purposes mentioned in §

21-11-3

, cause that establishment to be inspected and, if it is found to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter, shall issue a license upon receipt of a fee as set forth in §

23-1-54

; provided, that the license fee shall be at a reduced rate, as also set forth in §

23-1-54

, for any one establishment where: (1) the meat is sold only at retail, (2) no slaughtering is performed, and (3) no more than one of the activities described in §

21-11-3

for which a license is required is performed. In order to set the license renewal dates so that all activities for each establishment can be combined on one license instead of on several licenses, the department of health shall set the license renewal date. The license period shall be for twelve (12) months, commencing on the license renewal date, and the license fee shall be at the full annual rate regardless of the date of application or the date of issuance of license. If the license renewal date is changed, the department may make an adjustment to the fees of licensed establishments, not to exceed the annual license fee, in order to implement the change in license renewal date. Applications for renewal of licenses, accompanied by the prescribed fee, shall be submitted at least two (2) weeks before the renewal date. Licenses issued or renewed under this section may be suspended or revoked for failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2265, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 716, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 2; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1469, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-4

; P.L. 1960, ch. 76, § 20; P.L. 1961, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 94, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 15, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 39, § 38; P.L. 2012, ch. 241, art. 9, § 31.

21-11-5.
Regulations concerning processing and packing plants.

The director of health may adopt regulations governing the plant, equipment, operation, and maintenance of establishments defined in §

21-11-3

, the methods and materials used, the source and quality of water, sewage and waste disposal, the approval or condemnation and disposal of any carcass or part of a carcass, meat, meat products, and meat food product, insofar as they relate to the health and protection of the public and any matters which relate to the health and protection of the public. These regulations may prescribe the manner in which inspection will be performed and the periods during which licensees may operate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2265, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 3; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-5

; P.L. 1970, ch. 141, § 4.

21-11-6.
Stamping of meat — Sale of unstamped meat prohibited.

The director of health shall cause to be prepared a suitable stamp for impression upon the carcass of any animal or part of the carcass or any meat, meat product, or meat food product which has been examined and found to be sound, healthful, wholesome, and fit for human consumption. The carcass of any animal or part of the carcass or any meat, meat product, or meat food product not impressed in this manner shall be unsalable as food, and if exposed or offered for sale shall be confiscated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2265, §§ 5, 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, §§ 4-6; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-6

.

21-11-6.1.
Watering of meat.

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, association, or corporation to sell or possess with intent to sell within this state any meat the moisture content of which exceeds the maximum permitted under federal rules or regulations for meat shipped in interstate commerce.

History of Section.

P.L. 1968, ch. 5, § 1.

21-11-7.
Processing for private use.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to slaughtering of animals, or the canning, curing, smoking, packing, or rendering of the carcass of any animal or part of the carcass, where the animal is slaughtered by the owner of the animal and where the meat, meat product, or meat food product obtained from the animal is used for the private use of the owner of the animal slaughtered, or of the owner’s immediate family.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 5; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-7

; P.L. 1972, ch. 279, § 1.

21-11-8.
Federally inspected meat exempt.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent the sale or possession of the carcass of any animal or part of the carcass or any meat, meat product, or meat food product which has been inspected and passed by the agricultural research service of the United States Department of Agriculture.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-8

.

21-11-9.
Penalties for violations.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the regulations authorized by this chapter shall be punished:

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding three (3) months or by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for the first offense;

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding six (6) months or by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200) for the second offense; and

By a term of imprisonment not exceeding one year or by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by both the fine and imprisonment for a third or subsequent offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2265, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 6; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-9

.

21-11-10.
Enforcement — Prosecution of violations.

It shall be the duty of the director of health or the director’s duly appointed agents to enforce the provisions of this chapter and the regulations adopted in accordance with this chapter and to prosecute all persons guilty of violations of it. In all prosecutions the director, or his or her duly appointed agents, shall not be required to enter into any recognizance or to give surety for costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 264, § 7; P.L. 1943, ch. 1306, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-11-10

.

21-11-11 — 21-11-13.
Repealed.

21-11-14.
Repealed.